Washington statutes.
RCW 7.48.260

Warrant of abatement.

When, upon indictment or information, complaint or action, any person is adjudged guilty of a nuisance, if it be in superior court the court may in addition to the fine imposed, if any, or to the judgment for damages or costs, for which a separate execution may issue, order that such nuisance be abated, or removed at the expense of the defendant, and after inquiry into and estimating, as nearly as may be, the sum necessary to defray the expenses of such abatement, the court may issue a warrant therefor: PROVIDED, That if the conviction was had in a district court, the district judge shall not issue the order and warrant of abatement, but on application therefor, shall transfer the cause to the superior court which shall proceed to try the issue of abatement in the same manner as if the action had been originally commenced therein.

[ 1987 c 202 s 137; 1957 c 45 s 2; Code 1881 s 1249; 1875 p 81 s 15; RRS s 9926, part. FORMER PARTS OF SECTION: Code 1881 s 1250; 1875 p 81 s 16.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.